nb: Materiale for bremseklosser: Aluminium; Karbon; Keramisk kompositt; Kobber; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Titan; Annet
el: Υλικό πλάκας στήριξης τακακιού φρένου: Αλουμίνιο; Ανθρακόνημα; Κεραμικό σύνθετο; Χαλκός; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Τιτάνιο; Άλλο
ru: Материал опорной пластины тормозной колодки: Алюминий; Карбон; Керамический композит; Медь; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Титан; Другое
hu: Fékbetét hátlapjának anyaga: Alumínium; Karbon; Kerámiakompozit; Réz; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Titán; Egyéb
tr: Fren balatası taşıyıcı plaka malzemesi: Alüminyum; Karbon; Seramik kompozit; Bakır; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Titanyum; Diğer
ja: ブレーキパッド裏板の素材: アルミニウム; カーボン; セラミックコンポジット; 銅; ステンレス; スチール; チタン; その他
vi: Vật liệu tấm đỡ má phanh: Nhôm; Carbon; Composite gốm; Đồng; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Titan; Khác
th: วัสดุแผ่นรองหลังผ้าเบรก: อะลูมิเนียม; คาร์บอน; เซรามิกคอมโพสิต; ทองแดง; สเตนเลสสตีล; เหล็ก; ไทเทเนียม; อื่นๆ
fr: Matériau de la plaque support de plaquette de frein: Aluminium; Carbone; Composite céramique; Cuivre; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Titane; Autre
de: Material der Bremsbelag-Trägerplatte: Aluminium; Carbon; Keramik-Verbundwerkstoff; Kupfer; Edelstahl; Stahl; Titan; Sonstige
ko: 브레이크 패드 백킹 플레이트 재질: 알루미늄; 카본; 세라믹 복합재; 구리; 스테인리스 스틸; 스틸; 티타늄; 기타
pl: Materiał płytki nośnej klocka hamulcowego: Aluminium; Włókno węglowe; Kompozyt ceramiczny; Miedź; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Tytan; Inne
en: Brake pad backing plate material: Aluminum; Carbon; Ceramic composite; Copper; Stainless steel; Steel; Titanium; Other
zh-CN: 刹车片背板材料: 铝制; 碳制; 陶瓷复合材料; 铜制; 不锈钢; 钢制; 钛制; 其他
es: Material de la placa de soporte de la pastilla de freno: Aluminio; Carbono; Compuesto de cerámica; Cobre; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Titanio; Otro
sl-SI: Material nosilne plošče zavornih ploščic: Aluminij; Karbon; Keramični kompozit; Baker; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Titan; Drugo
sv: Material för bromsbeläggens stödplatta: Aluminium; Kolfiber; Keramisk komposit; Koppar; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Titan; Övrigt
cs: Materiál nosné desky brzdové destičky: Hliník; Karbon; Keramický kompozit; Měď; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Titan; Jiné
nl: Rem steunplaat materiaal: Aluminium; Carbon; Keramisch composiet; Koper; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Titanium; Overig
fi: Jarrupalojen taustalevyn materiaali: Alumiini; Hiili; Keraaminen komposiitti; Kupari; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Titaani; Muu
zh-TW: 煞車片背板材質: 鋁; 碳纖維; 陶瓷複合材質; 銅; 不鏽鋼; 鋼; 鈦; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal nosača kočionih pločica: Aluminij; Ugljik; Keramički kompozit; Bakar; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Titanij; Ostalo
ro-RO: Materialul plăcuței de susținere a plăcuțelor de frână: Aluminiu; Carbon; Compozit ceramic; Cupru; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Titan; Altele
sk-SK: Materiál nosiča brzdových doštičiek: Hliník; Karbón; Keramický kompozit; Meď; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Titán; Iný
bg-BG: Материал на носещата плоча на спирачните накладки: Алуминий; Карбон; Керамичен композит; Мед; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Титан; Други
lt-LT: Stabdžių trinkelės pagrindo plokštės medžiaga: Aliuminis; Anglis; Keraminis kompozitas; Varis; Nerūdijantis plienas; Plienas; Titanas; Kitas
it: Materiale della piastra di supporto delle pastiglie dei freni: Alluminio; Carbonio; Composito ceramico; Rame; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Titanio; Altro
pt-PT: Material da placa de suporte da pastilha de travão: Alumínio; Carbono; Compósito cerâmico; Cobre; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Titânio; Outro
pt-BR: Material da placa de suporte da pastilha de freio: Alumínio; Carbono; Compósito de cerâmica; Cobre; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Titânio; Outro
da: Bremseklodsens bagplademateriale: Aluminium; Carbon; Keramisk komposit; Kobber; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Titanium; Andet